Washington statutes.
RCW 43.92.080

Entry on lands authorized.

In order to carry out the purposes of this chapter, all persons employed by the department of natural resources to carry out the duties of this chapter are authorized to enter and cross all land within the state as long as no damage is done to private property.

[ 2006 c 340 s 8; 1965 c 8 s 43.92.080. Prior: 1909 c 245 s 3; RRS s 6000.]